Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2099.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 6778XS (1) 91 as/js S.F. 2099 Section 1. Section 717B.3A, subsections 1, 4, and 5, Code 1 2026, are amended to read as follows: 2 1. A person is guilty of animal torture if the person 3 intentionally or knowingly inflicts on an animal severe and 4 prolonged or repeated physical pain that causes the animalâs 5 serious injury or death crushes, burns, drowns, suffocates, 6 impales, or otherwise subjects an animal to serious injury or 7 death or causes, directs, or provides anything of value to 8 another person to do the same . 9 4. A person who commits animal torture is guilty of an 10 aggravated misdemeanor a class âDâ felony . 11 5. Notwithstanding subsection 4 , a person who commits 12 animal torture is guilty of a class âDâ âCâ felony if the 13 person has previously been convicted of committing animal 14 abuse pursuant to section 717B.2 , animal neglect punishable 15 as a serious misdemeanor or aggravated misdemeanor pursuant 16 to section 717B.3 , animal torture pursuant to this section , 17 injury to or interference with a police service dog pursuant to 18 section 717B.9 , bestiality pursuant to section 717C.1 , or an 19 act involving a contest event prohibited in section 717D.2 . 20